Utah statutes.
62A-14-111.   Duty of the county attorney or district attorney.

(1)  The attorney general shall advise the office on legal matters and represent the office in legal proceedings.

(2)  Upon the request of the attorney general, a county attorney may represent the office in connection with the filing of a petition for appointment as guardian or conservator of an incapacitated person and with routine, subsequent appearances.



Enacted by Chapter 69, 1999 General Session

